Virginia statutes. Title 67. Virginia Energy Plan.
§§ 67-100 through 67-1907.

Repealed by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 11, effective October 1, 2021.

Cross references.

For present provisions as to energy sources and policy, see Title 45.2, Subtitle V (§

45.2-1700

et seq.).

As to the Natural Gas Conservation and Ratemaking Efficiency Act, see § 56-600 et seq.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387 repealed and recodified former

Titles 45.1

and 67 as Title 45.2. Where appropriate, the historical citations to former sections have been added to corresponding new sections. For tables of corresponding former and new sections, see the tables in Volume 10.

09/12/2022 08:25AM FROM_EDEN_\\fabwebd5\data\EDEN_Prod\shared\ProductBuild\FolioOutput_VACODE_1-1662985374157

09/12/2022 08:25AM Pete_NFO_build

09/14/2022 03:38AM Pete_NFO_build

2022/09/14
20:16:29 IET005-ChkNukSliceNFO Validate links, remove links

09/14/2022 08:32PM Pete_CheckNuke_4xNFO_build